Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
Article 6 Aquaculture Development

Administrative rules and regulations.

Aquaculture, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia, Department of Natural Resources, Wildlife Resources Division, Subject 391-4-14.

27-4-251.
Short title.

This article may be cited as the “Georgia Aquaculture Development Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-251

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 8.

27-4-252.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Aquaculture” means the extensive or intensive farming of aquatic animals and plants.

“Commission” means the Aquaculture Development Commission created by Code Section 27-4-253.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-252

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 8; Ga. L. 2004, p. 948, § 2-6.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 1-1, repealed the provisions of the Georgia Pacific White Shrimp Development Aquaculture Act, effective July 1, 2019.
As a result, the amendment by Ga. L. 2004, p. 948, § 2-6, which was never funded and therefore remained dormant, is now moot.

27-4-253.
Aquaculture Development Commission created; membership; bylaws; quorum; reimbursement for expenses; meeting at call of chairman.

There is created the Aquaculture Development Commission. The commission shall be composed of 14 members as follows:

The president of the Georgia Aquaculture Association or his representative, who shall serve as chairman of the commission;

The president of the Georgia Farm Bureau Federation or his representative;

The dean of the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia or his representative;

The chairman of the Committee on Agriculture and Consumer Affairs of the House of Representatives or his representative;

The chairman of the Senate Agriculture and Consumer Affairs Committee or his representative;

The Commissioner of Agriculture or his representative;

The commissioner of natural resources or his representative;

The commissioner of economic development or his or her representative; and

Six members to be appointed by the president of the Georgia Aquaculture Association as follows:

Four members shall be representatives of the aquaculture industry;

One member shall be a representative of the commercial fish farming supply and equipment industry; and

One member shall be a representative of a private industry which is doing research in the promotion of fish farming.

Each of such six members shall be appointed for a term of two years and until a successor is appointed and assumes membership on the commission. The terms of the first six such members shall begin on July 1, 1989.

The members of the commission shall enter upon their duties without further act or formality. The commission may make such bylaws for its government as it deems necessary but is under no duty to do so. The commission may appoint working subcommittees based on identified needs. These subcommittees may consist of noncommission members who exhibit an interest in the development of the aquaculture industry of Georgia.

Eight members of the commission shall constitute a quorum necessary for the transaction of business, and a majority vote of those present at any meeting at which there is a quorum shall be sufficient to do and perform any action permitted the commission by this article. No vacancy on the commission shall impair the right of a quorum to transact any and all business of the commission.

The members shall not receive compensation for their services on the commission but those members who are public officials or employees shall be reimbursed from the funds of their employing department, agency, or branch of government for per diem, travel, and other expenses in the same manner and amount as they otherwise receive for performing services for their respective departments, agencies, or branches of government.

The commission shall meet upon the call of its chairman.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-253

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 8; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 27; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1059, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 690, § 13; Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 1/HB 117.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 20/HB 117, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act is intended to reflect the current internal organization of the Georgia Senate and House of Representatives and is not otherwise intended to change substantive law. In the event of a conflict with any other Act of the 2009 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act.”

27-4-254.
Duty of commission to develop aquaculture development plan; contents of plan; meetings of commission; staff support.

The commission shall make a thorough study of aquaculture and the potential for development and enhancement of aquaculture in the state. It shall be the duty of the commission to develop, distribute, and, from time to time, amend an aquaculture development plan for the State of Georgia for the purpose of facilitating the establishment and growth of economically viable aquaculture enterprises in Georgia. Such plan shall include:

An evaluation of Georgia’s natural resources as they relate to aquaculture;

An evaluation of species with potential for culture in Georgia;

An identification of constraints to development of aquaculture in Georgia and recommendations on methods to alleviate these constraints;

An identification of the roles of the Department of Agriculture and the Department of Natural Resources in supporting the aquaculture industry, including an evaluation of existing physical and personnel resources and recommendations for allocation of additional resources where needed;

Recommendations for implementation of the plan; and

An identification of the role of other state and federal agencies in the development of the aquaculture industry.

The commission is authorized to conduct meetings at such places and at such times as it considers expedient and to do all other things consistent with this article which are necessary or convenient to enable it to exercise its powers, perform its duties, and accomplish the objectives and purposes of this article.

Staff support for the commission shall be provided by the Department of Natural Resources with assistance from the Department of Agriculture and the Department of Economic Development.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-254

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 8; Ga. L. 2004, p. 690, § 14.

27-4-255.
Registration required for sale of domestic fish; regulation of sale without registration.

Any person engaged in the sale of domestic fish, except grocery stores, shall apply to the department for an aquaculture registration.
The domestic fish of a registered aquaculture producer shall be privately owned subject to regulation by the Department of Natural Resources; provided, however, any person selling “domestic fish” without first obtaining an aquaculture registration shall be considered to be selling “wildlife” or “wild animals” and shall be subject to the provisions of this title governing such sale.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-255

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 8.

27-4-256.
Duty of department to register sellers of domestic fish; expiration of registration.

The Department of Natural Resources shall register sellers of domestic fish under the applicable provisions of this article.
Such registration shall expire on April 1 following the second anniversary of registration; provided, however, that such registration shall expire 30 days following any change in the status of any information required by the provisions of this article or by any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this article to be reported to the department.
The department shall issue to registrants who update their registration new certificates of registration for the full period of registration provided for in this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-256

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 8; Ga. L. 1994, p. 600, § 6.

27-4-257.
Contents of application for registration.

All applications to the department for registration as a seller of domestic fish shall:

Designate an address in this state where the applicant can be personally served with legal process;

Contain an appointment of an agent in this state for acceptance of service of legal process, together with the agent’s address in this state; or

Contain a designation of the Secretary of State for acceptance of service of legal process.

A copy of such application shall be forwarded to the Secretary of State by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-257

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 8.

27-4-258.
Filing of application as admission of doing business in state.

The filing of an application with the department for registration as a seller of domestic fish shall constitute an admission by the applicant that the applicant is doing business in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-258

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 8.

27-4-259.
Denial of registration.

The Commissioner may deny registration to:

Any applicant with a criminal record;

Any applicant who is found by the Commissioner to have violated any law administered by the department or any regulation or quarantine of the department; or

A corporation, when any of its officers has a criminal record or is found by the Commissioner to have violated any law administered by the department or any regulation or quarantine of the department.

In the case of a partnership, all parties shall be considered applicants for the purpose of this Code section.

No registration shall be denied under this article without opportunity for hearing in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-259

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 8.

27-4-260.
Revocation of registration.

The Commissioner may revoke any outstanding registration where the holder of the same or any officer or agent of the holder is found by the Commissioner to have violated any law administered by the department or any regulation or quarantine of the department, provided that no registration shall be revoked under this Code section without opportunity for hearing in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-260

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 8.

27-4-261.
Certificate as evidence of registration; list of persons registered.

All registration certificates issued by the department shall be evidence of a registration.
The department shall maintain a current list of all persons registered under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-261

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 8.

27-4-262.
Rules and regulations.

The board shall make and publish in print or electronically such rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-262

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 8; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

27-4-263.
Inspections.

Any inspector or other person authorized to ascertain compliance with any rule or regulation of the department pertaining to the production or sale of domestic fish may enter during normal business hours and inspect the premises of a registered seller or producer of domestic fish to determine whether such person is in compliance with the rules and regulations of the department.

In the event any person refuses to give his consent to an inspection as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, the commissioner or any person authorized to make inspections may seek a warrant to make an inspection as provided in this subsection:

Any application for an inspection warrant shall be made to a person who is a judicial officer within the meaning of Code Section 17-5-21;

An inspection warrant shall be issued only upon cause and when supported by an affidavit particularly describing the place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected and the purpose for which the inspection is to be made. In addition, the affidavit shall contain either a statement that consent to inspect has been sought and refused or facts or circumstances reasonably justifying the failure to seek such consent. Cause shall be deemed to exist if either reasonable legislative or administrative standards for conducting a routine or area inspection are satisfied with respect to the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle, or there is reason to believe that a condition of nonconformity exists with respect to the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle;

An inspection warrant shall be effective for the time specified therein, but not for a period of more than 14 days, unless extended or renewed by the judicial officer who signed and issued the original warrant, upon satisfying himself that such extension or renewal is in the public interest. Such inspection warrant must be executed and returned to the judicial officer by whom it was issued within the time specified in the warrant or within the extended or renewed time. After the expiration of such time, the warrant, unless executed, is void;

An inspection pursuant to an inspection warrant shall be made between 8:00 A.M. and 6:00 P.M. of any day or at any time during operating or regular business hours. An inspection should not be performed in the absence of an owner or occupant of the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle unless specifically authorized by the judicial officer upon a showing that such authority is reasonably necessary to effectuate the purpose of the regulation being enforced. An inspection pursuant to a warrant shall not be made by means of forcible entry, except that the judicial officer may expressly authorize a forcible entry where facts are shown which are sufficient to create a reasonable suspicion of a violation of this title, which, if such violation existed, would be an immediate threat to health, safety, or welfare or where facts are shown establishing that reasonable attempts to serve a previous warrant have been unsuccessful. Where prior consent has been sought and refused and a warrant has been issued, the warrant may be executed without further notice to the owner or occupant of the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected;

It shall be unlawful for any person to refuse to allow an inspection pursuant to an inspection warrant issued as provided in this subsection. Any person violating this paragraph shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; and

Under this subsection, an inspection warrant is an order, in writing, signed by a judicial officer, directed to the commissioner or any person authorized to make inspections for the department, and commanding him or her to conduct any inspection authorized by any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this article.

The provisions of Code Section 27-1-23 shall not be applicable to any person registered under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-4-263

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1507, § 8.